Washington statutes.
RCW 3.30.080

Rules.

The supreme court may adopt rules of procedure for district courts. A district court may adopt local rules of procedure which are not inconsistent with state law or with the rules adopted by the supreme court. The rules for a county with a single district and multiple facilities may include rules to provide where cases shall be filed and where cases shall be heard. If the rules of the supreme court authorized under this section are adopted, all procedural laws in conflict with the rules shall be of no effect.

[ 1989 c 227 s 5; 1984 c 258 s 7; 1961 c 299 s 8.]

NOTES:

Intent—1989 c 227: See note following RCW 3.38.070.

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.